Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 23 Equipment and Accessories Generally
31-23-42.1.
Special mirrors on school buses.

Every school bus as defined in §

31-1-3

shall be equipped with a system of mirrors that will give the seated driver a view of the roadway to each side of the bus, and the area immediately in front of the front bumper, in accordance with the following specifications:

At least seven and one-half inches (71/2") of a thirty-inch (30") long rod shall be visible to the driver, either by direct view or by means of an indirect visibility system, when the rod is placed upright on the ground at any point along a traverse line extending one foot from the forward-most point of the bus and one foot from the length and width and rear of the bus.

Every school bus owner shall maintain a measuring rod thirty inches (30") in length with distinctive identification marks located at seven and one-half inch (71/2”) intervals for purposes of adjusting the system of mirrors required by this section in accordance with these specifications.

Other mirrors shall be located and adjustable so as to meet their intended minimum requirements, and may be incorporated in the system of mirrors required by this section.

Each school bus shall be equipped with at least two (2) flat-surfaced rectangular exterior mirrors, one situated on each side of the bus forward of the operator and any entrance door. The reflecting surface shall not be obscured and shall have a minimum reflective surface of fifty square inches (50 sq. in.). The mirrors shall be firmly supported and adjustable, and shall afford the driver a clear, stable, reflected view of the road surface at each side of the vehicle for a continual distance beginning at a point not greater than two hundred feet (200´) to the rear and continuing to the horizon when measured on a straight and level road.

Exterior mirror mounts shall include a wide-angle adjustable convex mirror to provide a close-in field of vision to the operator. Each school bus shall be equipped with convex mirrors that shall be mounted at the left front corner and the right front corner of the vehicle, sufficiently adjustable to enable a seated operator to observe a reflection of the area in front of the bus where children might stand or pass.

Each school bus shall be equipped with interior mirrors that shall afford the driver a view of the bus interior, emergency door, and the roadway to the immediate rear of the bus. Every school bus with a seating capacity of sixteen (16) passengers or fewer shall have a convex rear view mirror located near the right front corner, so as to provide the operator with a view of the ground area at the entrance door when the door is not equipped with safety glass in the lower portion of the door.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 448, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 17.

31-23-42.2.
Power equipment on school buses.

Every new school bus within the state shall be equipped with a dual braking system, including a power braking system, and power steering.

All school buses, model year 2010 and newer, shall have emergency brakes that are equipped with an interlock system so designed that the emergency brake may be released only when the service brake pedal is depressed and the ignition key is inserted in the ignition lock.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 72; P.L. 2007, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 423, § 1.

31-23-43.
Wheel safety chocks.

Every bus having a seat capacity of more than seven (7) passengers, every truck with a gross weight of more than seven thousand pounds (7,000 lbs.), and every tractor or trailer, or combination, operated upon the public highways shall be equipped with one pair of approved wheel safety chock blocks. Whenever the motor vehicle shall be parked on a highway on a grade sufficient to cause the vehicle to move of its own momentum, and is left unattended by the operator, the safety chock blocks shall be securely placed around the rear wheel of the vehicle so as to prevent movement of the vehicle.

Whenever the motor vehicle is equipped with positive spring-loaded air parking brakes, the vehicle need not be equipped with the safety wheel chocks.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 112, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 295, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-44.
Approved type of wheel safety chocks — Enforcement of requirements.

All wheel safety chock blocks described in §

31-23-43

must be a type approved by the division of motor vehicles, and the division of motor vehicles shall establish specifications and requirements for approved types of wheel safety chock blocks. The specifications and requirements shall, in general, follow the standards established by the department of revenue. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall suspend the registration of any motor vehicle described in §

31-23-43

not equipped with wheel safety chock blocks, until it is made to conform to the requirements of the section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 448, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 19; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 19.

31-23-45.
Tire treads.

No tire on a vehicle moved on a highway shall have on its periphery less than two thirty-seconds (2/32) of an inch of tread depth. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized to remove from a highway any vehicle not conforming to this requirement and shall suspend the registration of the motor vehicle until it is made to conform to the requirements of this section.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 32, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-46.
Department of environmental management — Vehicles.

All vehicles in use by the department of environmental management shall be equipped with a fire extinguisher. The fire extinguisher shall contain a potassium bicarbonate base dry chemical fire extinguishing agent, have an underwriter’s laboratory rating of six (6) B:C, and a capacity of two and one-half pounds (21/2 lbs.).

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 120, § 1.

31-23-47.
Slow moving vehicle emblems.

Except where otherwise specifically provided in this section, every motor vehicle designed for operation at speeds not in excess of twenty-five miles per hour (25 mph) shall at all times be equipped with a slow moving vehicle emblem mounted on the rear of the vehicle, which emblem shall comply with the current standards and specifications approved by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

Every motor vehicle normally operating at speeds not in excess of twenty-five miles per hour (25 mph) shall at all times be equipped with the emblem in the following manner:

Where a towed unit is sufficiently large to obscure any slow moving emblem on the rear of a motor vehicle only the towed unit need be equipped with the emblem; and

Where the slow moving vehicle emblem on the motor vehicle would not be obscured by the towed unit, then either or both may be equipped with the required emblem but it shall be sufficient if either has it.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 6, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 120.

31-23-48.
Police cars — Extinguishers.

Every state and municipal police vehicle in this state shall carry a fire extinguisher at all times.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 25, § 1.

31-23-49.
Transportation of gasoline — Penalty.

No motor vehicle shall be used to transport gasoline, except those which are duly registered with and approved by the division of motor vehicles. No container of whatever kind may be used to transport gasoline, except under the rules and regulations that may be promulgated and approved by the state fire marshal. The rules and regulations on containers shall, among other facets, regulate the size and kinds of containers that may be used to transport gasoline in the state of Rhode Island. Unless there exists an emergency condition that would require the transportation of gasoline by motor vehicle in a container or otherwise in response to an individual’s or the general public’s health, safety, or welfare, no person, firm, or corporation shall transport gasoline by motor vehicle, container, or otherwise except as provided in this section. This section shall not be applicable to any vehicle subject to the jurisdiction and regulatory authority of the federal government or any of its agencies.

Any person, firm, or corporation convicted of violating the provisions of this section or the rules and regulations promulgated by the state fire marshal or the division of motor vehicles under this section shall, upon conviction, be subject to the fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 58, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 10.

31-23-50.
Motorcycle reflectorized plates.

Every motorcycle registered within this state shall be equipped with reflectorized plates which shall be supplied by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, department of revenue, pursuant to rules and regulations to be determined by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, department of revenue.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 22, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 19; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 19.

31-23-51.
Earphones and headsets prohibited.

No person shall operate a bicycle or motor vehicle upon any highway while wearing earphones, a headset, headphone, or other listening device. Any person who violates this section shall be fined: (1) eighty-five dollars ($85.00) for the first offense, (2) ninety-five dollars ($95.00) for the second offense, and (3) one hundred forty dollars ($140) for the third and each subsequent offense.

This section shall not apply to:

Any emergency vehicle operator using an integrated intercom system;

Any person operating a motorcycle who is using a headset installed in a helmet and worn so as to prevent the speakers from making direct contact with the user’s ears so that the user can hear surrounding sounds;

Any person using a headset in conjunction with a cellular telephone that only provides sound through one ear and allows surrounding sounds to be heard with the other ear;

Any person using a headset in conjunction with the communicating with the central base operation that only provides sound through one ear and allows surrounding sounds to be heard with the other ear;

Any person using a hearing aid(s) or instrument for the improvement of hearing.

The department of motor vehicles shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 58, § 4; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 127; P.L. 2002, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 10; P.L. 2013, ch. 422, § 1.

31-23-52.
Removal of catalytic converter prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly remove or render inoperative, a catalytic converter installed on or in a motor vehicle or motor vehicle engine in compliance with federal regulations prior to or after its sale and delivery to the ultimate purchaser, except that a defective catalytic converter may be replaced with another device originally manufactured for use as a catalytic converter. Any person who violates this section shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 198, § 1.

31-23-53.
School bus public address sound system.

Every school bus placed in service shall be equipped with a public address sound system which shall be audible from a distance of not less than fifty feet (50´) and shall have a minimum of one speaker mounted outside the bus and a minimum of one speaker mounted inside the bus. The public address system and the method of installation shall be approved and certified by the division of motor vehicles. This system shall be inspected at all regularly scheduled inspections.

When the driver of the school bus has picked up students, the bus will remain stopped, with red lights flashing, until all students are seated. Prior to any student being permitted to disembark from the bus, the driver shall look to see that all approaching traffic has stopped and observed the flashing red signal. After students have disembarked from the bus, the driver shall allow ample time for the students to clear the bus area before closing the doors and then, after remaining stopped for approximately ten (10) seconds, the driver shall announce through the public address system that the bus will proceed.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall require a demonstration of the operation of the public address system at each school. The demonstration shall take place at least two (2) times per year, one of which shall take place during the month of September.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to school buses used exclusively for the transportation of students receiving special education pursuant to chapter 24 of title 16; provided, the school buses without the inside and outside speakers may not be used for students not receiving special education, except for transportation before or after normal school hours. This provision shall be limited to secondary education students.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 329, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 23, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 68.

31-23-54.
School buses — Fire extinguishers.

Every school bus shall be equipped with at least one pressurized, dry chemical-type fire extinguisher, mounted in the manufacturer’s extinguisher bracket and located in the driver’s compartment in full view of and readily accessible to the driver. A pressure gauge shall be so mounted on the extinguisher so that it may be easily read without removing the extinguisher from its mounted position. The fire extinguisher shall have a minimum capacity of two and one-half pounds (21/2 lbs.) and be of a type approved by the Underwriters Laboratories, Inc., with a rating of not less than ten (10) B:C. The operating mechanism shall be sealed with a type of seal that will not interfere with use of the fire extinguisher.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 448, § 2.

31-23-55.
Speedometer and odometer.

Every school bus is required to be equipped with a speedometer and odometer in good working order at all times. The odometer may be installed separate and apart from the odometer normally included in the speedometer head.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 448, § 2.

31-23-56.
Stop arm required.

Every school bus shall be equipped with a stop arm, approved by the department of revenue, which shall be activated whenever school children are being loaded or unloaded.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 360, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 19; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 19.

31-23-57.
Eye protection for motorcycle operators.

Every motorcycle operator shall be required to wear protective eyewear while operating on any highway within the state. The eyewear shall include, but not be limited to, safety goggles, safety eyeglasses, or a safety shield.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be fined twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense, fifty dollars ($50.00) for the second offense, and one hundred dollars ($100) for the third and each subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 537, § 1.

31-23-58.
Department of transportation — Vehicles — Backup warning device.

All state trucks in use by the department of transportation shall be equipped with a backup warning device that meets the latest minimum standards as promulgated by either federal occupational health and safety standards or the standards set by the department of transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 265, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 323, § 1.